LEXC/adjectives.lexc
LEXICON Adj_Prefix
@U.ADJ.PRE@:@U.ADJ.PRE@ma Adj_Root ;
@U.ADJ.CIR@:@U.ADJ.CIR@ma Adj_Root ;

LEXICON Adj_Root
lipay Adj "happy" ;
subo Adj "sad" ;
akig Adj "angry" ;
dasig Adj "fast" ;
hinay Adj "slow" ;
dako Adj "big" ;
gamay Adj "small" ;
damo Adj "many" ;
diutay Adj "few" ;

LEXICON Adj
Adj_Suffix ;
@U.ADJ.PRE@+Adj:@U.ADJ.PRE@ # ;

LEXICON Adj_Suffix
+Adj:%>on # ;

!TODO create in infix
